Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1060YH (2) 91 th/jh H.F. 354 Section 1. Section 68B.5A, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 4. A person who is subject to the requirements of subsection 3 1 and a person who served as an executive or administrative 4 head of a licensing board, as defined in section 272C.1, shall 5 not within two years after the termination of service or 6 employment become a lobbyist. 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 272C.7A Executive or administrative 8 head of licensing board ââ disqualified ââ penalty. 9 1. A person who was a lobbyist, as defined in section 68B.2, 10 shall not serve as the executive or administrative head of 11 a licensing board within two years after the person stopped 12 lobbying. 13 2. A person who knowingly and intentionally violates this 14 section commits a serious misdemeanor. 15